Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Chapter 7. Executors and Administrators
§ 91-7-79.
Letters granted to county administrator.

When it shall appear that any person has died, in this state or out of it, and has left real or personal property in this state, and some person has not applied for letters testamentary or of administration, the administration of the estate, after the expiration of sixty days from the death of such person, shall be committed to the county administrator, to whom letters of administration, administrator de bonis non, administration with the will annexed, or as the case may require, shall be granted. He shall administer the estate, as in other cases, under the direction of the court, with the same rights and liabilities as executors and other administrators. The county administrator shall not be bound to incur or be liable for costs, except such as the estate in his hands, in excess of his commissions shall be sufficient to pay. On the final settlement of the estate, he shall be allowed by the court, as his commissions, a sum not to exceed ten percent (10%) on the whole estate administered. The county administrator may also be appointed temporary administrator pending an appeal from the grant of letters testamentary or of administration, and administrator to institute suit in proper cases. He shall be liable in all cases on his official bond for his acts, and another bond need not be executed by him in any case unless, his official bond being insufficient, the court shall require an additional bond, or where he may be required to give bond to account for the proceeds of a sale of land.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 1092; 1880, §§ 2004, 2005; 1892, § 1858; 1906, § 2033; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1698; 1930, § 1637; 1942, § 533.

§ 91-7-81.
Accounts to be filed when office vacated.

Should the county administrator resign his office or otherwise vacate it, he shall forthwith file an account of his administration in each case. Should such officer die, settlements of all estates committed to him shall be made by his executor or administrator.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 1094; 1880, § 2006; 1892, § 1849; 1906, § 2023; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1688; 1930, § 1638; 1942, § 534.

§ 91-7-83.
Sheriff administrator in certain cases.

If it appears that any person has died, in this state or out of it, and has left property, and some person will not qualify as executor or administrator, the court, or clerk in vacation, shall appoint the sheriff to be administrator, who shall administer the estate. The sheriff shall not be bound to incur any cost except out of the estate, and he shall be allowed not more than ten percent (10%) on the amount thereof. Any sheriff who may be appointed administrator shall make settlement of his administration, if he hath not done so before, at the termination of his office and deliver whatever property he may have of the estate at the time to his successor in office, or to such other person as may be appointed administrator. His official bond as sheriff shall be security for his faithful administration of such estate, and he shall not be required to execute any other bond, except to account for the proceeds of a sale of land.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 19 (1); 1857, ch. 60, art. 68; 1871, § 1092; 1880, § 2007; 1892, § 1859; 1906, § 2034; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1699; 1930, § 1639; 1942, § 535.

§ 91-7-85.
Removal and surrender of trust.

Every executor or administrator may be removed if he become disqualified, or for improper conduct in office, at the instance of any person interested, on five days’ notice to such executor or administrator; or may surrender the trust, and thereupon shall give the proper notice to the distributees or legatees and settle with the court. In case of removal or resignation, administration shall be granted as in case of the death of the executor or administrator, and with like effect. An executor or administrator who may be removed, or who may surrender his trust, shall continue to be answerable to the court until his final settlement and satisfaction be made, and until that time shall be liable on his bond.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 60, art. 67; 1871, § 1122; 1880, § 2008; 1892, § 1860; 1906, § 2035; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1700; 1930, § 1640; 1942, § 536.

§ 91-7-87.
Administration revoked by proof of will and grant of letters testamentary.

If a will shall be found and probated and letters testamentary be granted thereon, the same shall be a revocation of the administration; but acts lawfully done by the administrator without actual notice of such revocation shall be valid and binding.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (55); 1857, ch. 60, art. 64; 1871, § 1119; 1880, § 1996; 1892, § 1853; 1906, § 2027; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1692; 1930, § 1641; 1942, § 537.

§ 91-7-89.
Letters of certain nonresidents revoked.

If letters testamentary or of administration be granted to any person not a resident of the state, or if any executor or administrator after his appointment remove out of the state, and if such executor or administrator refuse or neglect to settle his accounts annually or neglect the due administration thereof in any other respect, the court, after publication made and proof thereof as in other cases, or personal notice, may revoke the letters of such executor or administrator and proceed to grant administration de bonis non as if such executor or administrator had died or resigned.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 21 (7); 1857, ch. 60, art. 130; 1871, § 1188; 1880, § 2009; 1892, § 1861; 1906, § 2036; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1701; 1930, § 1642; 1942, § 538.

§ 91-7-90.
Order of abatement for shares of distributees of deceased's property.

Except as provided in subsection (2) and except as provided in connection with the share of the surviving spouse who elects to take an elective share, shares of distributees abate, without any preference or priority as between real and personal property, in the following order: (a) property not disposed of by the will; (b) residuary bequests and devises; (c) general bequests and devises; (d) specific bequests and devises. For purposes of abatement, a general bequest or devise charged on any specific property or fund is a specific bequest or devise to the extent of the value of the property on which it is charged, and upon the failure or insufficiency of the property on which it is charged, a general bequest or devise to the extent of the failure or insufficiency. Abatement within each classification is in proportion to the amounts of property each of the beneficiaries would have received, if full distribution of the property had been made in accordance with the terms of the will.

If the will expresses an order of abatement, or if the testamentary plan or the express or implied purpose of the devise would be defeated by the order of abatement stated in subsection (1), the shares of the distributees abate as may be found necessary to give effect to the intention of the testator.

If the subject of a preferred bequest or devise is sold or used incident to administration, abatement shall be achieved by appropriate adjustments in, or contribution from, other interests in the remaining assets.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 458, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 91-7-91.
Assets defined; unsecured creditors to give notice.

The real property, goods, chattels, personal property, choses in action and money of the deceased, or which may have accrued to his estate after his death from the sale of property, real, personal or otherwise, and the rent of lands accruing during the year of his death, whether he died testate or intestate, shall be assets and shall stand chargeable with all the just debts, funeral expenses of the deceased, and the expenses of settling the estate, without any preference or priority as between real and personal property, and shall abate in the manner set out in Section 91-7-90. However,in cases where no administration has been or shall be commenced on the estate of the decedent within three (3) years after his death, no creditor of the decedent shall be entitled to a lien or any claim whatsoever on any real property of the decedent, or the proceeds therefrom, against purchasers or encumbrancers for value of the heirs of the decedent unless such creditor shall, within three (3) years and ninety (90) days from the date of the death of the decedent, file on the lis pendens docket in the office of the clerk of the chancery court of the county in which the land is located notice of his claim, containing the name of the decedent, a brief statement of the nature, amount and maturity date of his claim and a description of the real property sought to be charged with the claim. The provisions of this section requiring the filing of notice shall not apply to any secured creditor having a recorded lien on the property.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 60, art. 80; 1871, § 1134; 1880, § 2025; 1892, § 1881; 1906, § 2056; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1721; 1930, § 1643; 1942, § 539; Laws, 1938, ch. 262; Laws, 1975, ch. 373, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 1976; Laws, 2019, ch. 458, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 91-7-93.
Inventory of money and property owned by decedent at time of death.

The executor or administrator shall, within ninety (90) days of the grant of his letters unless further time be allowed by the court or clerk, file an inventory, verified by oath, of the money and property owned by the decedent at the time of death, listing it with reasonable detail, and indicating as to each listed item, its market value as of the date of the decedent’s death, and the type and amount of any encumbrance that may exist with reference to any item.

There shall be no requirement for filing an inventory if the requirement of filing an inventory is waived in the testator’s will. The court or the chancellor may also waive the requirement for filing an inventory in an intestate estate upon petition to the court by the administrator. Even though the requirement of filing an inventory is waived in the testator’s will or waived by the court or the chancellor upon petition to the court by the administrator in an intestate estate, the court or the chancellor may later order the executor or administrator to file an inventory upon the petition of a beneficiary or other interested party if the court or the chancellor determines that the filing of inventory is necessary or advisable.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (78); 1857, ch. 60, art. 73; 1871, § 1127; 1880, § 2018; 1892, § 1864; 1906, § 2039; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1704; 1930, § 1644; 1942, § 540; Laws, 2019, ch. 458, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 91-7-95.
Supplementary inventory or appraisement.

If any property not included in the original inventory comes to the knowledge of the executor or administrator, or if the executor or administrator learns that the value or description indicated in the original inventory for any item is erroneous or misleading, he shall make a supplementary inventory or appraisement showing the market value as of the date of the decedent’s death of the new item or the revised market value or descriptions, and the appraisers or other data relied upon, if any, and file it with the court if the original inventory was filed, or furnish copies thereof or information thereof to persons interested in the new information.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (79); 1857, ch. 60, art. 75; 1871, § 1129; 1880, § 2020; 1892, § 1866; 1906, § 2041; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1706; 1930, § 1645; 1942, § 541; Laws, 2019, ch. 458, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 91-7-97.
Adoption of collector’s inventory or new inventory.

In case an inventory be returned by a temporary administrator, the executor or administrator who may succeed to the administration shall, within ninety days after the grant of his letters, either return a new inventory in place of the collector’s inventory or file a written acknowledgment of the receipt of the articles contained in the first inventory and consent to be answerable for the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (80); 1857, ch. 60, art. 76; 1871, § 1130; 1880, § 2021; 1892, § 1867; 1906, § 2042; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1707; 1930, § 1646; 1942, § 542.

§ 91-7-99.
All to join in returning inventory.

If there be more than one executor, administrator, or temporary administrator, they shall all join in returning the inventories. If one or more refuse to do so, the others may return them, and the power and authority of the person so refusing shall thereafter cease. Those who return the inventory shall proceed in the administration, unless the delinquent, within sixty days, assign a reasonable excuse which the court may deem satisfactory.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (86); 1857, ch. 60, art. 78; 1871, § 1132; 1880, § 2022; 1892, § 1869; 1906, § 2044; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1709; 1930, § 1647; 1942, § 543.

§ 91-7-101.
Debt from executor or administrator inventoried.

The naming of an executor in a will shall not operate to extinguish any claim which the deceased had against him, but it shall be the duty of every such executor accepting the trust to give in such claim in the list of debts. On his failure to give in such claim or any part thereof, any person interested in the estate may allege the facts by petition to the court, and the court shall decide on the validity of the claim, if it be denied. When the claim is established, the executor shall account for it as a debtor to the estate, and not otherwise; and in the same way and subject to all the foregoing provisions, an administrator shall give in a claim against himself.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49; art. 1 (88); 1857, ch. 60, art. 74; 1871, § 1128; 1880, § 2019; 1892, § 1865; 1906, § 2040; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1705; 1930, § 1648; 1942, § 544.

§ 91-7-103.
Summary proceeding for discovery of assets.

If the goods, chattels, and effects are improperly withheld from the executor or administrator, then he shall not be answerable for a failure to return the inventories herein required until the goods, chattels, and effects, or some part thereof, have been received. If the executor or administrator shall have cause to believe that any of the assets of the estate are concealed or have been or are wrongfully withheld from him, or that any person has in his possession or under his control any records, books, or documents containing evidence concerning such assets and the ownership thereof, or has knowledge or information thereof otherwise, then it shall be the duty of such executor or administrator to forthwith proceed by a summary petition before the court or chancellor against all persons suspected of having concealed or wrongfully withheld such assets, as well as all persons having books, records, documents, or information relating thereto, for a discovery of the assets of the estate and all adverse claim thereto, if any. All persons made parties to such petition may be compelled by attachment for contempt to discover under oath by answer filed or testimony given, either or both at such time and place as the court or chancellor may direct, all the facts known to them concerning the assets of the estate and of all adverse claims thereto, if any. If on the hearing it shall appear that any person has property or assets of the estate to which there is no adverse claim, the court or chancellor may direct it to be delivered to the executor or administrator, who shall forthwith account therefor in his inventory. No decree shall be rendered in such proceeding concerning any adverse claim set up by any person to any of the assets. The costs of such proceeding shall be borne by the estate.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (80); 1857, ch. 60, art. 76; 1871, § 1130; 1880, § 2021; 1892, § 1868; 1906, § 2043; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1708; 1930, § 1649; 1942, § 545; Laws, 1936, ch. 241.

§ 91-7-105.
Failure to return inventory.

If any executor, administrator, or temporary administrator fail to return proper inventories within the time prescribed by law or by order of the court, a summons returnable in not less than five days may, on application of any person interested, be issued for such executor, administrator, or collector to show cause why such inventory hath not been returned. If the summons be returned executed and such party do not appear or, appearing, fail to show good cause, the court, or clerk in vacation, shall revoke the letters and grant administration anew.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (85); 1857, ch. 60, art. 77; 1871, § 1131; 1880, § 2023; 1892, § 1870; 1906, § 2045; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1710; 1930, § 1650; 1942, § 546.

§ 91-7-107.
Perfect inventory may be compelled.

If any person interested discover that the inventory returned does not contain a full account of all the property, goods, chattels, and effects of the deceased, such person may, on petition to the court, have the executor, administrator, or temporary administrator cited to appear and show cause why an additional inventory should not be returned. If, on hearing, the court be satisfied that a true inventory was not originally returned, it may order the executor or administrator to return a new one; and on his failure to do so, his letters may be revoked. If the title to any property not inventoried be in dispute, it shall be sufficient for the executor, administrator, or collector so to report; and he shall not be required to return an additional inventory until the title be settled in his favor. It shall also be the duty of every executor and administrator to return additional inventories at least once in each year of the increase of the property of the estate, if there be any such increase.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (87); 1857, ch. 60, art. 79; 1871, § 1133; 1880, § 2024; 1892, § 1871; 1906, § 2046; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1711; 1930, § 1651; 1942, § 547.

§ 91-7-109.
Inventory and appraisement by qualified disinterested persons.

The executor or administrator may employ a qualified and disinterested appraiser to assist him in ascertaining the fair market value as of the date of the decedent’s death of any asset the value of which may be subject to reasonable doubt. Different persons may be employed to appraise different kinds of assets included in the estate. The names and addresses of any appraiser shall be indicated on the inventory with the item or items he appraised.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (72); 1857, ch. 60, art. 70; 1871, § 1124; 1880, § 2014; 1892, § 1872; 1906, § 2047; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1712; 1930, § 1652; 1942, § 548; Laws, 2019, ch. 458, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 91-7-111.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 458, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§91-7-111. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (71); 1857, ch. 60, art. 69; 1871, § 1123; 1880, § 2015; 1892, § 1873; 1906, § 2048; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1713; 1930, § 1653; 1942, § 549.]

§ 91-7-113.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 458, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§91-7-113. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (72); 1857, ch. 60, art. 70; 1871, § 1124; 1880, § 2014; 1892, § 1874; 1906, § 2049; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1714; 1930, § 1654; 1942, § 550.]

§ 91-7-115.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 458, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§91-7-115. [Codes, 1892, § 1875; 1906, § 2050; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1715; 1930, § 1655; 1942, § 551.]

§ 91-7-117.
Executor or administrator to set apart exempt property.

It shall be the duty of the executor or administrator to set apart to the widow and children, or to the widow if there be no children, or to the children if there be no widow, such personal property as is exempt by law from execution. The action of the executor or administrator shall not be necessary to the title of the widow and children to the exempt property, which shall vest in them by operation of law on the death of the husband and father.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 1290; 1880, § 1278; 1892, § 1876; 1906, § 2051; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1716; 1930, § 1656; 1942, § 552; Laws, 2019, ch. 458, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§§ 91-7-119 through 91-7-133.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 44, eff from and after April 1, 1977.

§91-7-119. [Codes, 1942, § 553; Laws, 1936, ch. 237]

§91-7-121. [Codes, 1892, § 1909; 1906, § 2084; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1751; 1930, § 1657; 1942, § 554]

§91-7-123. [Codes, 1892, § 1910; 1906, § 2085; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1752; 1930, § 1658; 1942, § 555]

§91-7-125. [Codes, 1892, § 1911; 1906, § 2086; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1753; 1930, § 1659; 1942, § 556]

§91-7-127. [Codes, 1892, § 1912; 1906, § 2087; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1754; 1930, § 1660; 1942, § 557]

§91-7-129. [Codes, 1892, § 1913; 1906, § 2088; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1755; 1930, § 1661; 1942, § 558]

§91-7-131. [Codes, 1892, § 1914; 1906, § 2089; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1756; 1930, § 1662; 1942, § 559]

§91-7-133. [Codes, 1892, § 1915; 1906, § 2090; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1757; 1930, § 1663; 1942, § 560]

§ 91-7-135.
Court or chancellor to set apart one year’s support for family.

It shall be the duty of the court or the chancellor to set apart out of the effects of the decedent, for the spouse and children who were being supported by the decedent, or for the spouse if there be no such children, or for such children if there be no spouse, one (1) year’s provision, including such provision as may be embraced in the exempt property set apart. If there be no provisions, or an insufficient amount, the court or the chancellor shall determine the sum necessary for the comfortable support of the spouse and children, or spouse or children, as the case may be, for one (1) year.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 17 (1); 1857, ch. 60, art. 172; 1871, §§ 1290, 1957; 1880, § 1279; 1892, § 1877; 1906, § 2052; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1717; 1930, § 1664; 1942, § 561; Laws, 1992, ch. 321 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1992); Laws, 2019, ch. 458, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 91-7-137.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 458, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§91-7-137. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (75); 1857, ch. 60, arts. 71, 72; 1871, §§ 1125, 1126; 1880, §§ 2016, 2017; 1892, § 1878; 1906, § 2053; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1718; 1930, § 1665; 1942, § 562.]

§ 91-7-139.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 458, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§91-7-139. [Codes, 1892, § 1879; 1906, § 2054; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1719; 1930, § 1666; 1942, § 563.]

§ 91-7-141.
Court or chancellor may apportion year’s allowance.

The court or the chancellor may apportion the one (1) year’s allowance, or any part of it, according to the situation, rights, and interests of any of the children or the widow, and may direct the payment of any portion of the allowance which may be found necessary or proper to any of them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 1959; 1880, § 1281; 1892, § 1880; 1906, § 2055; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1720; 1930, § 1667; 1942, § 564; Laws, 2019, ch. 458, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 91-7-143.
Minor distributee or legatee maintained.

An executor or administrator of a solvent estate may defray the necessary and reasonable expenses of the maintenance and education of legatees or distributees who are minors and have no guardian, and may be allowed a credit therefor against the shares of the estate to which such minors are entitled on distribution. Before making such expenditures, he shall obtain the order of the court, or of the chancellor in vacation, authorizing him to make them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2094; 1892, § 1954; 1906, § 2128; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1796; 1930, § 1668; 1942, § 565.

§ 91-7-145.
Notice to creditors of estate.

The executor or administrator shall make reasonably diligent efforts to identify persons having claims against the estate. Such executor or administrator shall mail a notice to persons so identified, at their last known address, informing them that a failure to have their claim probated and registered by the clerk of the court granting letters within ninety (90) days after the first publication of the notice to creditors will bar such claim as provided in Section 91-7-151.

The executor or administrator shall file with the clerk of the court an affidavit stating that such executor or administrator has made reasonably diligent efforts to identify persons having claims against the estate and has given notice by mail as required in subsection (1) of this section to all persons so identified. Upon filing such affidavit, it shall be the duty of the executor or administrator to publish in some newspaper in the county a notice requiring all persons having claims against the estate to have the same probated and registered by the clerk of the court granting letters, which notice shall state the time when the letters were granted and that a failure to probate and register within ninety (90) days after the first publication of such notice will bar the claim. The notice shall be published for three (3) consecutive weeks, and proof of publication shall be filed with the clerk. If a paper be not published in the county, notice by posting at the courthouse door and three (3) other places of public resort in the county shall suffice, and the affidavit of such posting filed shall be evidence thereof in any controversy in which the fact of such posting shall be brought into question.

The filing of proof of publication as provided in this section shall not be necessary to set the statute of limitation to running, but proof of publication shall be filed with the clerk of the court in which the cause is pending at any time before a decree of final discharge shall be rendered; and the time for filing proof of publication shall not be limited to the ninety-day period in which creditors may probate claims.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (115); 1857, ch. 60, art. 81; 1871, § 1135; 1880, § 2026; 1892, § 1929; 1906, § 2103; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1771; 1930, § 1669; 1942, § 566; Laws, 1920, ch. 302; Laws, 1928, ch. 69; Laws, 1975, ch. 373, § 4; Laws, 1989, ch. 582, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 430 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1994).

§ 91-7-147.
Newspaper notices dispensed with in small estates.

Where the value of an estate shall not be more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), the court shall dispense with newspaper notices; and notices in lieu thereof shall be posted for thirty (30) days at the courthouse door and two (2) other public places in the county. Failure of persons having claims against the estate to have their claims probated and registered by the clerk of the court granting letters within ninety (90) days after the date on which notice is posted will bar such claims as provided in Section 91-7-151.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 60, art. 97; 1871, § 1157; 1880, § 2066; 1892, § 1891; 1906, § 2066; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1731; 1930, § 1670; 1942, § 567; Laws, 1994, ch. 430, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1994).

§ 91-7-149.
Probate of claims.

Any person desiring to probate his claim shall present to the clerk the written evidence thereof, if any, or if the claim be a judgment or decree, a duly certified copy thereof, or if there be no written evidence thereof, an itemized account or a statement of the claim in writing, signed by the creditor, and make affidavit, to be attached thereto, to the following effect, viz.: That the claim is just, correct, and owing from the deceased; that it is not usurious; that neither the affiant nor any other person has received payment in whole or in part thereof, except such as is credited thereon, if any; and that security has not been received therefor except as stated, if any. Thereupon, if the clerk shall approve, he shall indorse upon the claim the words following: “Probated and allowed for $ _______________and registered this_______________day of_______________ , A.D.,_______________ ,” and shall sign his name officially thereto. Probate registration and allowance shall be sufficient presentation of the claim to the executor or administrator; provided, that should the clerk probate and allow and register the claim, but fail or neglect to indorse thereon the words, “Probated and allowed for $ _______________and registered the_______________day of_______________ , A.D.,_______________ ,” and officially sign his name thereto, the court may, upon proper showing, allow the clerk to indorse on the claim, nunc pro tunc, the words, “Probated and allowed for $ _______________and registered, this the_______________day of_______________ , A.D.,_______________ ,” and sign his name officially thereto. If the claim be based upon a demand of which there is no written evidence or upon an itemized account, the statement of said claim or the itemized account shall be retained and kept by the clerk among the official papers pertaining to the estate; and if the claim be based upon a promissory note or other instrument purporting to have been executed by the decedent, the creditor shall file with his claim either the original thereof or a duplicate of such original in the discretion of the creditor. If the original writing is presented to the clerk, it may be withdrawn by the creditor, and the clerk shall make a duplicate thereof. No specific writing or certificate shall be required to be made by the clerk on either the original writing or the duplicate retained by the clerk. In no instance shall an original writing be required to be presented to the clerk unless (a) a question is raised by the personal representative of the estate, or by any party in interest, as to the authenticity of the original or (b) in the circumstances it would be unfair to admit into evidence the duplicate in lieu of the original. In either of the above situations, the court or chancellor, upon good cause being shown, may require the creditor to produce the original before the court or clerk for the inspection of the personal representative or other party in interest, who may examine the original and who may make photographic copies thereof under the supervision of the clerk.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, any record, voucher, claim, check, draft, receipt, writing, account, statement, note or other evidence which may be furnished, filed, probated, presented or produced, or required to be produced, by a federally regulated bank, thrift or trust company shall be deemed to be an original admitted, furnished, filed, probated, presented, or produced for all purposes and with the same effect as the original, if such financial institution produces a copy of such evidence from a format of storage commonly used by financial institutions, whether electronic, imaged, magnetic, microphotographic or otherwise.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (90); 1857, ch. 60, art. 82; 1871, § 1137; 1880, § 2027; 1892, § 1932; 1906, § 2106; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1774; 1930, § 1671; 1942, § 568; Laws, 1934, ch. 304; Laws, 1991, ch. 413, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 42, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1996).

§ 91-7-151.
Claims to be registered in ninety days or barred; amendment of affidavits.

All claims against the estate of deceased persons, whether due or not, shall be registered, probated and allowed in the court in which the letters testamentary or of administration were granted within ninety (90) days after the first publication of notice to creditors to present their claim. Otherwise, the same shall be barred and a suit shall not be maintained thereon in any court, even though the existence of the claim may have been known to the executor or administrator. Where the affidavit is made in good faith and the claim is registered, probated and allowed by the clerk but the affidavit is defective or insufficient, the court may allow the affidavit to be amended so as to conform to the requirements of the statute, at any time before the estate is finally settled; whereupon the probate shall be as effective and the claim as valid against the estate as if the affidavit had been correct and sufficient in the first instance.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 20 (5); 1857, ch. 60, art. 83; 1871, § 1141; 1880, § 2028; 1892, § 1933; 1906, § 2107; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1775; 1930, § 1672; 1942, § 569; Laws, 1926, ch. 157; Laws, 1975, ch. 373, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1976.

§ 91-7-153.
Registration of claim stops limitation.

The presentation of a claim, and having it probated and registered as required by law, shall stop the running of the general statute of limitations as to such claim, whether the estate be solvent or insolvent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2062; 1892, § 1936; 1906, § 2110; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1778; 1930, § 1673; 1942, § 570.

§ 91-7-155.
Executor to pay probated, registered debts.

It shall be the duty of an executor or administrator to speedily pay the debts due by the estate out of the assets, if the estate be solvent; but he shall not pay any claim against the deceased unless the same has been probated, allowed, and registered.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (90); 1857, ch. 60, art. 81; 1871, §§ 1135, 1137; 1880, §§ 2026, 2027; 1892, § 1931; 1906, § 2105; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1773; 1930, § 1674; 1942, § 571.

§ 91-7-157.
Executor to pay taxes.

An executor or administrator shall pay all taxes that may be due on real and personal property belonging to the estate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 1930; 1906, § 2104; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1772; 1930, § 1675; 1942, § 572.

§ 91-7-159.
Agreement with commissioner of internal revenue to exercise discretion in distributing assets of estate or trust.

The executor, trustee, or other fiduciary having discretionary powers under a last will and testament or transfer in trust shall be authorized to enter into agreements with the commissioner of internal revenue of the United States of America and other taxing authorities to exercise the fiduciary’s discretion so that the assets to be distributed in satisfaction of a bequest or transfer in trust will be selected in such a manner that cash and other properties distributed will have an aggregate fair market value representative of the pecuniary legatee’s or transferee’s proportionate share of the appreciation or depreciation in value to the date, or dates, of distribution of all property then available for distribution in satisfaction of such bequest or transfer. It is the purpose of this section to authorize such fiduciary to enter into any agreement that may be necessary or advisable in order to secure for federal estate tax purposes the maximum marital deduction available under the Internal Revenue Laws of the United States of America, and to do and perform all acts incident to such purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 572.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 295, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 91-7-161.
Creditors whose claims are not due must accept payment.

The executor or administrator may pay any debt, duly probated, allowed and registered, which is not due. After ninety (90) days from the grant of letters, the creditor shall accept payment thereof and give a full discharge therefor, upon the payment or tender to him of an amount equal to what the debt would have been had it been made payable on the day the payment or tender is made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 1938; 1906, § 2112; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1780; 1930, § 1676; 1942, § 573; Laws, 1975, ch. 373, § 6, eff from and after January 1, 1976.

§ 91-7-163.
Claim of executor or administrator to be treated same as other claims.

An executor or administrator shall not be allowed to retain any part of the assets in payment of his own claim against the deceased, unless the same be probated and registered as other claims and passed by the court. Every such claim shall stand upon an equal footing with other claims of the same nature.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (108); 1857, ch. 60, art. 85; 1871, § 1143; 1880, § 2030; 1892, § 1935; 1906, § 2109; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1777; 1930, § 1677; 1942, § 574.

§ 91-7-165.
Claims may be contested.

The executor or administrator, legatee, heir, or any creditor may contest a claim presented against the estate. The court or clerk may refer the same to auditors, who shall hear and reduce to writing the evidence on both sides, if any be offered, and report their findings with the evidence to the court. Thereupon the court may allow or disallow the claim, but such proceeding shall not be had without notice to the claimant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 60, art. 84; 1871, § 1142; 1880, § 2029; 1892, § 1934; 1906, § 2108; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1776; 1930, § 1678; 1942, § 575.

§ 91-7-167.
Creditor having lien failing to present claim.

A creditor of a decedent who has a lien of any kind on property of the decedent shall not be barred of his right to enforce the lien against the property by a failure to present his claim and have it probated and registered, but shall be barred of all claim to be satisfied out of the assets not affected by such lien. A person claiming to have a lien on any property of the decedent may be made a party to any proper proceeding by the executor or administrator or a creditor to test the validity of such claim to a lien, and to determine upon the right of such claim. This may be in a proceeding to sell property, which may be ordered to be sold free from such lien, or subject to it; and the decree may be made as to a sale and disposition of the proceeds of the sale of the property, as may be according to the rights of parties before the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2031; 1892, § 1937; 1906, § 2111; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1779; 1930, § 1679; 1942, § 576.

§ 91-7-169.
Growing crop.

The court or chancellor may, on the application of an executor or administrator, decree the sale of the crop growing at the time of the death of the testator or intestate, upon such terms and in such manner as may be deemed best. If the interest of the estate would be promoted by the cultivation and completion of the crop, on application therefor by the executor or administrator, it shall be so ordered by the court or chancellor; and in such case the executor or administrator shall take charge of the farm and manage the same until the crop be completed and gathered, retaining for that purpose so much of the property thereon as may be necessary. The proceeds shall be assets in his hands, the necessary expenses being first deducted; and, in either case, the executor or administrator shall render a true account of the crop. In case of the sale of the growing crop, the purchaser thereof may at all reasonable times enter upon the lands to cultivate and gather the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (84); 1857, ch. 60, art. 96; 1871, § 1156; 1880, § 2063; 1892, § 1882; 1906, § 2057; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1722; 1930, § 1680; 1942, § 577.

§ 91-7-171.
Farm may be cultivated or rented.

The court or chancellor, upon the application of executor or administrator, may allow him to cultivate or lease the farm or lands of the decedent for a period of not exceeding fifteen months from the grant of letters testamentary or of administration, if the interest of the estate, in the opinion of the court or chancellor, would be promoted thereby; or the court or chancellor, upon the application of the executor or administrator, may allow him to cultivate or lease the farm or lands of the decedent from year to year for the purpose of paying the debts of the decedent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 1883; 1906, § 2058; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1723; 1930, § 1681; 1942, § 578; Laws, 1918, ch. 125.